California, session 20252026, SB979.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 65584.05 of the Government Code is amended to read:65584.05. (a) At least one and one-half years before the scheduled revision required by Section 65588, each council of governments and delegate subregion, as applicable, shall distribute a draft allocation of regional housing needs to each local government in the region or subregion, where applicable, and the department, based on the methodology adopted pursuant to Section 65584.04 and shall publish the draft allocation on its internet website. The council of governments may additionally distribute the draft allocation plan upon adoption of the final methodology reviewed and accepted by the department pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (i) of Section 65584.04. The draft allocation shall include the underlying data and methodology on which the allocation is based, and a statement as to how it furthers the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584. It is the intent of the Legislature that the draft allocation should be distributed before the completion of the update of the applicable regional transportation plan. The draft allocation shall distribute to localities and subregions, if any, within the region the entire regional housing need determined pursuant to Section 65584.01 or within subregions, as applicable, the subregion’s entire share of the regional housing need determined pursuant to Section 65584.03.(b) Within 30 days following receipt of the draft allocation, a local government within the region or the delegate subregion, as applicable, or the department may appeal to the council of governments or the delegate subregion for a revision of the share of the regional housing need proposed to be allocated to one or more local governments. Appeals shall be based upon comparable data available for all affected jurisdictions and accepted planning methodology, and supported by adequate documentation, and shall include a statement as to why the revision is necessary to further the intent of the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584. An appeal pursuant to this subdivision shall be consistent with, and not to the detriment of, the development pattern in an applicable sustainable communities strategy developed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 65080. Appeals shall be limited to any of the following circumstances:(1) The council of governments or delegate subregion, as applicable, failed to adequately consider the information submitted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 65584.04.(2) The council of governments or delegate subregion, as applicable, failed to determine the share of the regional housing need in accordance with the information described in, and the methodology established pursuant to, Section 65584.04, and in a manner that furthers, and does not undermine, the intent of the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584.(3) A significant and unforeseen change in circumstances has occurred in the local jurisdiction or jurisdictions that merits a revision of the information submitted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 65584.04. Appeals on this basis shall only be made by the jurisdiction or jurisdictions where the change in circumstances has occurred.(c) At the close of the period for filing appeals pursuant to subdivision (b), the council of governments or delegate subregion, as applicable, shall notify all other local governments within the region or delegate subregion and the department of all appeals and shall make all materials submitted in support of each appeal available on a publicly available internet website. Local governments and the department may, within 45 days, comment on one or more appeals. If no appeals are filed, the draft allocation may be adopted pursuant to subdivision (g).(d) No later than 30 days after the close of the comment period, and after providing all local governments within the region or delegate subregion, as applicable, at least 10 days prior notice, the council of governments or delegate subregion shall conduct one public hearing to consider all appeals filed pursuant to subdivision (b) and all comments received pursuant to subdivision (c).(e) No later than 45 days after the public hearing pursuant to subdivision (d), the council of governments or delegate subregion, as applicable, shall do all of the following:(1) (A) Make a final determination that either accepts, rejects, or modifies each appeal for a revised share filed pursuant to subdivision (b). Final determinations shall be based upon the information and methodology described in Section 65584.04 and whether the revision is necessary to further the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584. The final determination shall be in writing and shall include written findings as to how the determination is consistent with this article. The final determination on an appeal may require the council of governments or delegate subregion, as applicable, to adjust the share of the regional housing need allocated to one or more local governments that are not the subject of an appeal.(B) The final determination in subparagraph (A) shall be subject to judicial review pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure. For the purposes of subdivisions (e) and (f) of Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the court may exercise its independent judgment on the evidence.(2) Issue a proposed final allocation plan.(3) Submit the proposed final allocation plan to the department.(4) Set a date for a public hearing to adopt a final allocation plan pursuant to subdivision (g).(f) In the proposed final allocation plan, the council of governments or delegate subregion, as applicable, shall adjust allocations to local governments based upon the results of the appeals process. If the adjustments total 7 percent or less of the regional housing need determined pursuant to Section 65584.01, or, as applicable, total 7 percent or less of the subregion’s share of the regional housing need as determined pursuant to Section 65584.03, then the council of governments or delegate subregion, as applicable, shall distribute the adjustments proportionally to all local governments. If the adjustments total more than 7 percent of the regional housing need, then the council of governments or delegate subregion, as applicable, shall develop a methodology to distribute the amount greater than the 7 percent to local governments. The total distribution of housing need shall not equal less than the regional housing need, as determined pursuant to Section 65584.01, nor shall the subregional distribution of housing need equal less than its share of the regional housing need as determined pursuant to Section 65584.03.(g) Within 45 days after the issuance of the proposed final allocation plan by the council of governments and each delegate subregion, as applicable, the council of governments shall hold a public hearing to adopt a final allocation plan. To the extent that the final allocation plan fully allocates the regional share of statewide housing need, as determined pursuant to Section 65584.01 and has taken into account all appeals, the council of governments shall have final authority to determine the distribution of the region’s existing and projected housing need as determined pursuant to Section 65584.01. The council of governments shall submit its final allocation plan to the department within three days of adoption. Within 15 days after the department’s receipt of the final allocation plan adopted by the council of governments, the department shall determine if the final allocation plan is consistent with the existing and projected housing need for the region, as determined pursuant to Section 65584.01. The department may revise the determination of the council of governments if necessary to obtain this consistency.(h) Any authority of the council of governments to review and revise the share of a city or county of the regional housing need under this section shall not constitute authority to revise, approve, or disapprove the manner in which the share of the city or county of the regional housing need is implemented through its housing program.(i) Any time period in subdivision (d) or (e) may be extended by a council of governments or delegate subregion, as applicable, for up to 30 days. Any time period in subdivision (b), (c), (d), (e), or (g) may be reduced by a council of governments or delegate subregion, as applicable, to facilitate earlier adoption of the final allocation plan. No time period shall be reduced to fewer than a minimum of 10 days.(j) The San Diego Association of Governments may follow the process in this section for the draft and final allocation plan for the sixth revision of the housing element notwithstanding such actions being carried out before the adoption of an updated regional transportation plan and sustainable communities strategy.